Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4989.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [16B.313] AMERICAN-MADE MATERIALS USED IN STATE-FUNDED PROJECTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Covered project" means an infrastructure, transportation, housing, school, or public facility project funded by state money. new text end new text begin (c) "Made in the United States" means all the components of cement, concrete, and steel that were not produced in the United States constitute less than five percent of the total cost of the cement, concrete, and steel. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Made in the United States. new text end new text begin A covered project receiving state public money for the project must ensure that cement, concrete, and steel used in the project are made in the United States. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Waiver. new text end new text begin (a) An agency as defined in section 16B.01, subdivision 2, may grant a waiver of the requirement in subdivision 2 if the agency determines that any of the following conditions apply: new text end new text begin (1) there is no cement, concrete, or steel available that meets the requirement in subdivision 2; new text end new text begin (2) the procurement of cement, concrete, or steel that meets the requirement in subdivision 2 would increase the cost of the covered project by more than 25 percent; or new text end new text begin (3) an emergency exists that requires the immediate procurement of cement, concrete, or steel for a covered project and cement, concrete, or steel meeting the requirement in subdivision 2 is not immediately available. new text end new text begin (b) No later than 30 days after the agency grants a waiver under this subdivision, the agency must publish a copy of the waiver granted on the agency's website. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner shall provide guidance on the requirement and waiver provisions of this section to all state procurement employees and update the department's policies to include a bid preference for covered projects that commit to using products manufactured in this state. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Conflict with any other state law. new text end new text begin If another state law applies to the procurement of cement, concrete, or steel for a covered project, and if this section conflicts with that law, this section applies to the procurement of cement, concrete, or steel to the extent that it does not conflict with that law. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to all procurement contracts authorized on or after that date. new text end